Wyoming, session 2025, HB0294.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-4-601(d)(intro), (vi), (vii),
(o)(intro) and by creating a new subsection (p) is amended
to read:

9-4-601. Distribution and use; funds, accounts,
cities and towns benefited; exception for bonus payments.

HB0294

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0711
(d) Except as provided in subsections (k), (m), (n)
and (o) and (p) of this section, any revenue received under
subsection (a) of this section in excess of two hundred
million dollars ($200,000,000.00) shall be distributed as
follows:

(vi) From the amounts which would otherwise be
distributed to the school foundation program account under
paragraph (iii) of this subsection and amounts that would
otherwise be distributed under paragraphs (k)(i), (m)(i),
(n)(i) and (o)(i) and (p)(i) of this section, there is
annually appropriated to the common school permanent fund
reserve account the amount determined under W.S.
9-4-719(g). The appropriation shall be credited to the
account as provided in W.S. 9-4-719(g);

(vii) From the amounts that would otherwise be
distributed to the budget reserve account under paragraph
(iv) of this subsection and the amounts that would
otherwise be distributed under paragraphs (k)(ii), (m)(ii),
(n)(ii) and (o)(ii) and (p)(ii) of this section, amounts
necessary to make the required revenue bond payments as
HB0294

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0711
provided by W.S. 9-4-1003(d), but in no event more than
eighteen million dollars ($18,000,000.00) annually;

(o) For fiscal year 2025, any revenue received under
subsection (a) of this section in excess of five hundred
forty-nine million four hundred thousand dollars
($549,400,000.00) and for fiscal year 2026, any revenue
received under subsection (a) of this section in excess of
five hundred thirty million two hundred thousand dollars
($530,200,000.00) shall be distributed as follows:

(p) For fiscal year 2026 and each fiscal year
thereafter, any revenue received under subsection (a) of
this section in excess of the amount of revenue under
subsection (a) of this section estimated to be received in
the last revenue forecast issued by the consensus revenue
estimating group in the most recent even-numbered calendar
year shall be distributed as follows:

(i) One-half (1/2) to the common school
permanent fund reserve account;

HB0294

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0711
(ii) One-half (1/2) to the permanent Wyoming
mineral trust fund reserve account.

Section 2. W.S. 9-4-601(k), (m) and (n) is repealed.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0294